apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="покли/кати__vblex_perf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>чу</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чемо</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чеш</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чете</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>че</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чуть</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кати</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чмо</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ч</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чте</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кав</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кала</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кало</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кали</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кавши</l><r>кати<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кан</l><r>каний<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійськ/ий"/></e>
</pardef>

<!--pardef n="покли/кати__vblex_perf_tv">
</pardef-->

<pardef n="поклика/ти__vblex_impf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>тиму</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимемо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимеш</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимете</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тиме</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимуть</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ймо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>йте</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>в</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ла</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ло</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ли</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ємо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єш</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єте</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>є</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ють</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="поклика/ти__vblex_impf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>тиму</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимемо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимеш</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимете</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тиме</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тимуть</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ймо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>йте</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>в</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ла</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ло</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ли</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ємо</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єш</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єте</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>є</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ють</l><r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

</pardefs>

<e lm="покликати"><i>покли</i><par n="покли/кати__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="покликати"><i>поклика</i><par n="поклика/ти__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="покликати"><i>поклика</i><par n="поклика/ти__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
